Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 3. Procedure in Civil Cases.
§ 16.1-109.
Appellate court may require new or additional security.

The court to which the appeal is taken may on motion for good cause shown, after reasonable notice to the appellant, require the appellant to give new or additional security, and if such security be not given within the time prescribed by the appellate court the appeal shall be dismissed with costs, and the judgment or order of the court from which the appeal was taken shall remain in effect and the appellate court shall award execution thereon, with costs, against the appellant and his surety.

When a bond or other security is required by law to be posted or given in connection with an appeal or removal from a district court, and there is either (i) a defect in such bond or other security as a result of an error of the district court, or (ii) the district court erroneously failed to require the bond or other security, and the defect or failure is discovered prior to sending the case to the circuit court, the district court shall order that the appellant or applicant for removal cure such defect or failure within a period not longer than the initial period of time for posting the bond or giving the security. If the error or failure is discovered after the case has been sent to the circuit court, the circuit court shall return the case to the district court for the district court to order the appellant or applicant for removal to cure the defect or post the required bond or give the required security within a period of time not longer than the initial period of time for posting the bond or giving the security for removal. Failure to comply with such order shall result in the disallowance of the appeal or denial of the application for removal.

History.

1956, c. 555; 2007, c. 464.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 464 added the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 360.

§ 16.1-110.
Bankruptcy of appellant does not release surety.

No surety in any appeal bond given by the appellant shall be released by the appellant’s being adjudicated a bankrupt at any time subsequent to the judgment rendered in the court not of record, but such surety shall be entitled to make any defense on the trial of the appeal that the appellant could have made, except the defense of bankruptcy.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-111.
Court to which appeal sent.

The party taking an appeal may, when there is more than one court having jurisdiction, direct to which of such courts the appeal shall be sent for trial, but in the absence of such directions the judge or clerk shall send the same to any court having jurisdiction.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-112.
All papers transmitted to appellate court; further proceedings.

The judge or clerk of any court from which an appeal is taken under this article shall promptly transmit to the clerk of the appellate court the case papers, which shall include the original warrant or warrants or other notices or pleadings with the judgment endorsed thereon, together with all pleadings, exhibits, and other papers filed in the trial of the case. The required bond, and, if applicable, the money deposited to secure such bond and the writ tax and costs paid pursuant to §

16.1-107

shall also be submitted, along with the fees for service of process of the notice of appeal in the circuit court. Upon receipt of the foregoing by the clerk of the appellate court, the case shall then be docketed, except that an appeal from an order of protection issued pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

shall be assigned a case number within two business days upon receipt of such appeal.

When such case has been docketed, the clerk of such appellate court shall by writing to be served, as provided in §§

8.01-288

,

8.01-293

,

8.01-296

, and

8.01-325

, or by certified mail, with certified delivery receipt requested, notify the appellee, or by regular mail to his attorney, that such an appeal has been docketed in his office, provided that upon affidavit by the appellant or his agent in conformity with §

8.01-316

being filed with the clerk, the clerk shall post such notice at the front door of his courtroom and shall mail a copy thereof to the appellee at his last known address or place of abode or to his attorney, and he shall file a certificate of such posting and mailing with the papers in the case. No such appeal shall be heard unless it appears that the appellee or his attorney has had such notice, or that such certificate has been filed, 10 days before the date fixed for trial, or has in person or by attorney waived such notice.

If a party files an appeal of a district court order of protection entered pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

, such notice of appeal shall be on a form prescribed by the Office of the Executive Secretary. The district court clerk shall contact the appellate court to determine whether the hearing on the appeal shall be set by the appellate court on (i) a date scheduled by the district court clerk with the court, (ii) on the next docket call date, or (iii) a date set for district court appeals. Once the hearing date is set and the appeal documents have been transmitted, the appellate court shall have the parties served with notice of the appeal stating the date and time of the hearing in accordance with subdivision 1 of §

8.01-296

. No such hearing on the appeal shall be heard in the appellate court unless the appellee has been so served with such notice or notice has been waived by the non-moving party.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 211; 1972, c. 585; 1984, c. 108; 1988, c. 698; 2004, c. 366; 2016, c. 612; 2018, cc. 32, 134; 2019, c. 718; 2020, c. 905.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 612, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2017, provides: “That any clerk who uses private technology systems authorized pursuant to §

17.1-502

may utilize the provisions of §

16.1-112

provided that the electronic method for transmittal to the appellate court complies with the security and data standards established by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 366 added the language beginning “and the fees for service of process” at the end of the first sentence in the first paragraph; and in the last paragraph, inserted “or by regular mail” near the middle of the first sentence and substituted “10” for “ten” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 612, effective January 1, 2017, in the first paragraph, divided the former first sentence into the first and second sentences, inserted “case papers, which shall include the” in the first sentence, substituted “§

16.1-107

shall also be submitted along with the fees” for “§

16.1-107

, and the fees” in the second sentence and added the third through sixth sentences; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 32 and 134 are identical, and deleted the third through fifth sentences in the first paragraph, which pertained to electronic submission of court records.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 718, in the first paragraph, added “except that an appeal from an order of protection issued pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

shall be assigned a case number within two business days upon receipt of such appeal” at the end; and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 905 added the last paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 360.

§ 16.1-113.
How appeals tried.

Every such appeal shall be tried by the court in a summary way, or, if the amount in controversy exceeds fifty dollars, by a jury if either party requires it. All legal evidence produced by either party shall be heard, whether or not it was produced before the court from which the appeal is taken. If judgment is recovered by the appellee, execution shall issue against the principal and his surety, jointly or separately, for the amount of the judgment, including interests and costs, with damages on the aggregate at the rate of ten percent annually, from the date of that judgment until payment, and for the costs of the appeal; and the execution shall be endorsed “No security is to be taken.” If the decision is reversed, the party substantially prevailing shall recover his costs and the order or judgment shall be made or given as ought to have been made or given by the judge of the court from which the appeal was taken. When the appeal is from an order or judgment under §§

16.1-119

through

16.1-121

, the court shall enter such judgment respecting the property, the expense of keeping it, and any injury done to it, as may be equitable among the parties.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1980, c. 129; 1984, c. 38; 1988, c. 337.

Cross references.

See §

16.1-114.1

. For rules of court governing procedure in civil actions, see Rules 3:1 through 3:25.

Law Review.

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 362, 363.

§ 16.1-114.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

§ 16.1-114.1.
Principles applicable in trial of appeals; defective or irregular warrants or motions.

Actions or proceedings appealed from district courts shall be tried according to the principles of law and equity, and when the same conflict the principles of equity shall prevail. No warrant, motion or other pleading shall be dismissed by reason of a mere defect, irregularity or omission in the proceedings in the district court, or in the form of any such pleading, when the same may be corrected by a proper order of the court of record. In any such case the court of record shall retain the same, with full power to direct all necessary amendments, to enter orders and direct proceedings to correct such defects, irregularities and omissions, to promote substantial justice to all parties, and to bring about a trial of the merits of the controversy. In any case where an appeal is taken by a defendant the circuit court may direct amendments to increase the amount of the claim above the jurisdictional amount set forth in §

16.1-77

. This section shall be liberally construed, to the end that justice is not delayed or denied by reason of errors in the pleadings or in the form of the proceedings.

History.

1986, c. 45; 1997, c. 753; 2007, c. 869.

Cross references.

See §

16.1-113

. For rules of court governing procedure in civil actions, see Rules 3:1 through 3:25. Specifically, for application of rules, see Rule 3:1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 869 deleted “or removed” following “proceedings appealed” near the beginning.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Nonsuit in Virginia Civil Trials,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 265 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Amendments, § 4; 1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 363, 364.

§ 16.1-115.
Repealed by Acts 1986, c. 45.

§ 16.1-116.
Issuance of executions and abstracts and proceedings by interrogatories after papers returned to circuit court.

When a judgment has been rendered in a civil action in a general district court and the papers in the action have been returned to the clerk of the circuit court for filing and preserving, executions upon and abstracts of the judgment may be issued by the clerk of such circuit court within the periods permitted under §

8.01-251

, provided that such judgment has been duly entered in the judgment lien docket book of such court. However, for a period of two years from the date of any such judgment, the judge or clerk of the general district court may also issue executions upon and abstracts of the judgment. In addition, proceedings by interrogatories may be had in the circuit court as if the judgment had been rendered by that court.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1962, c. 444; 1983, c. 499.

§ 16.1-117.
When papers in civil cases in certain municipal courts may be destroyed.

The clerk of any municipal court in which papers are filed and preserved under §

16.1-69.55

may destroy the files, papers and records connected with any civil case in such court, if:

Such case was dismissed without any adjudication of the merits of the controversy, and the final order entered was one of dismissal and six months have elapsed from the date of such dismissal; or

Judgment was entered in such case but the right to issue an execution or bring a scire facias or an action on such judgment is barred by §

8.01-251

; and

The destruction of such papers is authorized and directed by an order of the judge of the court in which they are filed and preserved, which order may refer to such papers by any one or more of the above classifications, or to any group or kind of cases embraced therein, without express reference to any particular case.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-118.
When papers in civil cases returned to courts of record may be destroyed.

The clerk of any court of record to whose office papers in civil cases in the district court have been returned for indexing and preserving under §

16.1-69.55

may destroy the files, papers and records connected with any such civil case, if:

Such case was dismissed without any adjudication of the merits of the controversy, and the final order entered was one of dismissal and one year has elapsed from the date of such dismissal; or

Judgment was entered in such case but twenty years have elapsed since entry of such judgment and a motion to extend the period for enforcement of judgment has not been brought prior to the expiration of twenty years from the date such judgment was entered; or

No service of the warrant or motion or other process or summons was had on any defendant and one year has elapsed from the date of such process or summons; and

The destruction of such papers is authorized and directed by an order of the judge of the court in which they are preserved, which order may refer to such papers by any one or more of the above classifications, or to any group or kind of cases embraced therein, without express reference to any particular case.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1962, c. 444; 1972, c. 491; 1977, c. 169; 1982, c. 153.

§ 16.1-118.1.
Destruction of papers in civil cases in certain district courts.

In Henrico County or Montgomery County, the clerk of any district court in which papers are filed and preserved under §

16.1-69.55

may destroy the files, papers and records connected with any civil case in such court, if:

Such case was dismissed without any adjudication of the merits of the controversy, and the final order entered was one of dismissal and one year has elapsed from the date of such dismissal; or

Judgment was entered in such case but the right to issue an execution or bring a motion to extend the period for enforcing a judgment or an action on such judgment is barred by §

8.01-251

; or

No service of the warrant or motion or other process or summons was had on any defendant and one year has elapsed from the date of such process or summons; and

The destruction of such papers is authorized and directed by an order of the judge of the court in which they are preserved, which order may refer to such papers by any one or more of the above classifications, or to any group or kind of cases embraced therein, without express reference to any particular case; and

The audit has been made for the period to which the files, papers and records are applicable.

History.

1966, c. 404; 1973, c. 143; 1977, c. 169; 1982, c. 153; 2007, c. 813.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Henrico County or Montgomery County” for “any county having a population of more than 70,000 but less than 75,000 or more than 100,000 but less than 125,000 and adjoining a city having a population of more than 200,000 but less than 300,000, or in any county operating under the county manager form of government as provided in Chapter 6 (§

15.2-600

et seq.) of Title 15.2” in the introductory paragraph.